District of Columbia statutes.
1-327.32

Establishment of the Customer Service Operations Unit; Duties.

(a)

There is hereby established the Customer Service Operations Unit within the Executive Office of the Mayor.

(b)

The Customer Service Operations Unit shall be the District of Columbia’s primary point of entry for citizens and customers attempting to access nonemergency services, solicit information, or register a complaint or comment about an agency. The calls to the Customer Service Operations Unit shall be tracked, monitored, and reported to all necessary agencies. The information collected from the calls to the Customer Service Center Operations Unit shall be used in determining where additional services are required, where specific services need improvement, and which current services are effective.

History

Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-190, § 1202, 49 DCR 6968

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-327.33 and § 1-327.51.

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 1-328.02.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see §§ 3202 to 3208 of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-486, August 2, 2004, 51 DCR 8236).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see §§ 3202 to 3208 of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-594, October 26, 2004, 51 DCR 11725).